src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!%{ˈ1%}
"Diphthong extra short marker in vertical line ˈ character"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in +N+Sg+Ill
!! **ciâlkâlm:ciâˈlklmest**
!!
 %{ˈ1%}:ˈ <=>
     SurfaceDiphthong _ (i|u) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen: [%^Allegro: |%^CC2CAllegro:] ;
!! ciâlkâlm+N+Pl+Gen:
!€ ciâ{ˈ1}lkâlm^Pen^Allegro ^RmVow:0 >i
!!€ ciâ{ˈ1}lkâlm^Pen^Allegro^RmVow>i
!!€ ciâˈlk0lm000>i




!! ### Removing X3 length mark
"Removing Consonant X3 length mark after diphthong in vertical line ˈ LEFT ARROW"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving
!! b c č ǯ d đ g ǧ k ǩ l m n p r s š t v also htˈt nˈnj
! NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL [%^C2CC:]
!! ```
 ˈ:0 <=> (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     b _ b:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     c: _ c:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^KKK2G: |%^KKK2GG: ] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     č: _ č:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^KKK2G: |%^KKK2GG:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     ʒ _ ʒ:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     ǯ _ ǯ:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     d _ d:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     đ _ đ:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     g: _ g:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
!         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     :ǧ _ [:ǧ|ǧ:0|g:0]     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     j _ j:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     k: _ k:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:+ PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL] [%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^KKK2GG: |%^KKK2G: |%^Pen: %^KKK2ZERO: |%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     :ǩ _ [:ǩ|ǩ:0|k:0]     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     l _ l:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     m _ m:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     n _ n: (j) [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     ŋ: _ ŋ:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     p: _ p:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     r _ r:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     s: _ s:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^KKK2G: |%^KKK2GG:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     š: _ š:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^KKK2G: |%^KKK2GG:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:) (h) t: _ t:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
         (ʹ: |%{ʹØ%}:)     v _ v:     [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL | Vow: Cns:*  PenNeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL %^Pen: ][%^CCC2CC: |%^CCC2C: |%^CCC2CAllegro:] ;
!! ```

!W!"Hyphen with Vx in b, h, etc "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W!#:%- <=> :Vx  _ :Vx    ;
!W!      where Vx in ( b  h  p  t ) matched ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx in f, j, etc "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W!#:%- <=> :Vx  _ :Vx    ;
!W!      where Vx in ( f  j  m  r ) matched ;
!W!
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx  in multiples k ǩ "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx (:0) _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( k ǩ ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples g ǧ ǥ "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx (:0) _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( g ǧ ǥ ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples c č "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx (:0) _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( c č ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples s š "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx (:0) _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( s š ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples z ž "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx (:0) _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( z ž ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples d đ "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx (:0) _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( d đ ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples v w "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx (:0) _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( v w ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples a å ä â "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx  _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( a å ä â ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples o õ "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( o õ ) ;
!W!
!W!"Hyphen with Vx and Vx in multiples l n "
!W!!! __@RULENAME@__ check sma
!W! #:%- <=> :Vx (:0) (j) _ :Vx  ;
!W!        where Vx in ( l n ) ;

!"#:# retension to avoid hyphen"
!! **@RULENAME@** - $ Sakssa-jânnam
! #:# <=>
!     [k|:ǩ] (:0) Dummy:* _  [Ltrs - [k|ǩ]] ;
!        [g|:ǧ|:ǥ] (:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [g|ǧ|ǥ]] ;
!        [c|č] (:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [c|č]] ;
!        [s|š] (:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [s|š]] ;
!        [:z|:ž] (:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [z|ž]] ;
!        [d|:đ] (t:0|đ:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [d|đ]] ;
!    :i Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - i] ;
!        :u Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - u] ;
!        :y Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - y] ;
!        [:e|:ẹ] Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [e|ẹ]] ;
!        [:o|:õ|:ö] Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [o|õ|ö]] ;
!        [:a|:å|:ä|:â] Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [a|å|ä|â]] ;
!        [:v|w] (v:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - [v|w]] ;
!        b Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - b] ;
!        f (f:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - f] ;
!        h Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - h] ;
!        [k:j|č:j|j j: |[Ltrs - [l: |n:]] j] Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - j] ;
!!FIXME work with [n (n:)|l (l:)] j
!    l (l:0)  Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - l] ;
!    m (m:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - m] ;
!    [ŋ (ŋ:0)|n (n:0) ] Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - n] ;
!    p Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - p] ;
!    r (r:0) Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - r] ;
!    t Dummy:* _ [Ltrs - t] ;


"Hyphen for splitting between look-alikes"
!! **@RULENAME@** - used in Kääzzkõsraajõstuâjj-joouk
 %#:%- <=>
      [:k|:ǩ]          (:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ [k|ǩ] ;
   [:g|:ǧ|:ǥ]          (:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ [g|ǧ|ǥ] ;
      [:c|:č]          (:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ [c|č] ;
      [:s|:š]          (:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ [s|š] ;
      [:z|:ž]          (:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ [z|ž] ;
      [:d|:đ]     (t:0|đ:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ [d|đ] ;
      [:v|:w]         (v:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ [v|w] ;
           :b               Dummy:* (∑) _ b ;
           :f         (f:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ f ;
           :h               Dummy:* (∑) _ h ;
           :j         (j:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ j ;
           :l (l:0)         Dummy:* (∑) _ l ;
           :m         (m:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ m ;
 [:ŋ (ŋ:0)|:n (n:0)    ]    Dummy:* (∑) _ n ;
           :p               Dummy:* (∑) _ p ;
           :r         (r:0) Dummy:* (∑) _ r ;
           :t               Dummy:* (∑) _ t ;

           :i               Dummy:* (∑) _ i ;
           :u               Dummy:* (∑) _ u ;
           :y               Dummy:* (∑) _ y ;
      [:e|:ẹ]               Dummy:* (∑) _ [e|ẹ] ;
   [:o|:õ|:ö]               Dummy:* (∑) _ [o|õ|ö] ;
[:a|:å|:ä|:â]               Dummy:* (∑) _ [a|å|ä|â] ;

!! Sakssajânnam+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: (∑) **Germany/Saksa**
!€ Sakssa#jânnam
!!€ Sakssa#jânnam
!!€ Sakssa#jânnam
!!$ Sakssa#jânnam
!!$ Sakssa-jânnam

!! koummlo-õhtt+Num+Sg+Nom: (∑) **21**
!!€ koummlo#õhtt
!!€ koummlo-õhtt
!!$ koummlo#õhtt
!!$ koummlo#õhtt

!! tuâjj+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#joukk+N+Sg+Nom:  **team/työryhmä**
!!€ tuâjj#joukk
!!€ tuâjj-joukk
!!$ tuâjj#joukk
!!$ tuâjj#joukk

!! sääʹmm+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#musikk+N+Sg+Nom: **Skolt Sámi music/kolttamusiikki**
!! sää0mm^PAL^CC2C{-Ø}#musikk
!! sääʹm000-#musikk

!Q!!        Cx  _  Cx ;
!Q!!  where Cx in (b f h j l m n p q r t v w x ʒ ǯ ŋ) ;
!Q!!!€ kääzzkõsraajõstuâjj0#joukk
!Q!!!€ kääzzkõsraajõstuâjj-#joukk
!Q!

"Disallow UltRmVow after anything but Vows:0"
!! **@RULENAME@** - 
%^UltRmVow:0 /<= [Cns: |Vow] _ ;

"Disallow NoHyph marking for lookalikes between non-look-alikes"
!! **@RULENAME@** -
 %^1NoHyph:0 /<=
      [:k|:ǩ]          (:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [k|ǩ] ] ;
   [:g|:ǧ|:ǥ]          (:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [g|ǧ|ǥ] ] ;
      [:c|:č]          (:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [c|č] ] ;
      [:s|:š]          (:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [s|š] ] ;
      [:z|:ž]          (:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [z|ž] ] ;
      [:d|:đ]     (t:0|đ:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [d|đ] ] ;
      [:v|:w]         (v:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [v|w] ] ;
           :b               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - b ] ;
           :f         (f:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - f ] ;
           :h               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - h ] ;
           :j         (j:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - j ] ;
           :l (l:0)         Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - l ] ;
           :m         (m:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - m ] ;
 [:ŋ (ŋ:0)|:n (n:0)    ]    Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - n ] ;
           :p               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - p ] ;
           :r         (r:0) Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - r ] ;
           :t               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - t ] ;

           :i               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - i ] ;
           :u               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - u ] ;
           :y               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - y ] ;
      [:e|:ẹ]               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [e|ẹ] ] ;
   [:o|:õ|:ö]               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [o|õ|ö] ] ;
[:a|:å|:ä|:â]               Dummy:* ∑ _ # [ Ltrs - [a|å|ä|â] ] ;


!!TESTS
!echo 'c e ä {ʹØ}:0 v 0:ˈ v ^CC2CCC:0 > a' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/morphology/.generated/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'cieʹvv+N+Sg+Ill' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst
